Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1766
Collection of taxes; suit by aggrieved municipal corporations.

Cities, towns, villages, or corporate authorities or persons aggrieved may prosecute suit against any treasurer, or other officer collecting or receiving funds for their use, upon his or her bond, in the name of the State of Nebraska, for their use in any court of competent jurisdiction, whether the bond has been put in suit at the instance of the Tax Commissioner or not. Cities, towns, villages, and other corporate authorities or persons shall have the same right in any suits or proceedings in their behalf as is provided in case of suits by or on behalf of the state.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 189, p. 457;

R.S.1913, § 6517;

C.S.1922, § 6045;

C.S.1929, § 77-1950;

R.S.1943, § 77-1766;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 173;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 86.